Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1010
Recreational trails; public policy.

It is the public policy of the State of Nebraska that (1) abandoned railroad rights-of-way should be kept intact for future possible use as recreation, conservation, communications, and transportation corridors and (2) the laws of the State of Nebraska should be construed to effectuate this policy.

Laws 1993, LB 739, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-815.58;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 385.